Hawaii statutes.
[§657D-13] Fines and penalties on
contracts. When an action for compliance with the terms of any contract is
stayed pursuant to this chapter, no fine or penalty shall accrue by reason of
failure to comply with the terms of the contract during the period of the
stay. In any case where a person fails to perform any obligation and a fine or
penalty for the nonperformance is incurred, a court may relieve the enforcement
of the fine or penalty on such terms as may be just if the person was in the
military service when the penalty was incurred and that by reason of that
service the ability of the person to pay or perform was thereby materially
impaired. [L 1994, c 257, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next